apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="spel/l__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ls</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
<pardef n="/eat__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eats</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ate</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaten</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>               
    
<pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lt</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lt</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eling</l>
          <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ight</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ight</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ights</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ighting</l>
          <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="floodli/ght__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ght</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghts</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ghting</l>
          <r>ght<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="fl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>own</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    

<e lm="eat"><par n="/eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fly"><i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="light"><i>li</i><par n="floodli/ght__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smell"><i>smel</i> <par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
